src/case.regex
a (->) A, b (->) B, c (->) C, d (->) D, g (->) G, e (->) E, f (->) F,
h (->) H, z (->) Z, ž (->) Ž, 
i (->) I, j (->) J, k (->) K, l (->) L, m (->) M, n (->) N,
o (->) O, ö (->) Ö, p (->) P, r (->) R, s (->) S, t (->) T, u (->) U,
ü (->) Ü, v (->) V, č (->) Č, ä (->) Ä || .#. _ ;
